Washington statutes.
RCW 39.46.100

RCW 39.46.010 through 39.46.070 constitutes alternative method.

RCW 39.46.010 through 39.46.070 shall be deemed to provide a complete, additional, and alternative method for the performance of those subjects authorized by these sections and shall be regarded as supplemental and additional to powers conferred by other state laws. Whenever bonds and other obligations are issued and sold in conformance with RCW 39.46.010 through 39.46.070, such issuance and sale need not comply with contrary requirements of other state laws applicable to the issuance and sale of bonds or other obligations.

[ 1983 c 167 s 8.]

NOTES:

Liberal construction—Severability—1983 c 167: See RCW 39.46.010 and note following.